Utah statutes.
41-3-103.   Exceptions to "dealer" definition -- Dealer licensed in other state.

Under this chapter:

(1) (a)  An insurance company, bank, finance company, company registered as a title lender under Title 7, Chapter 24, Title Lender Registration Act, company registered as a check casher or deferred deposit lender under Title 7, Chapter 23, Check Cashing and Deferred Deposit Lending Registration Act, public utility company, commission impound yard, federal or state governmental agency, or any political subdivision of any of them or any other person coming into possession of a motor vehicle as an incident to its regular business, that sells the motor vehicle under contractual rights that it may have in the motor vehicle is not considered a dealer.

(b)  A person who sells or exchanges only those motor vehicles that the person has owned for over 12 months is not considered a dealer.

(2) (a)  A person engaged in leasing motor vehicles is not considered as coming into possession of the motor vehicles incident to the person's regular business.

(b)  A pawnbroker engaged in selling, exchanging, or pawning motor vehicles is considered as coming into possession of the motor vehicles incident to the person's regular business and must be licensed as a used motor vehicle dealer.

(3)  A person currently licensed as a dealer or salesperson by another state or country and not currently under license suspension or revocation by the administrator may only sell motor vehicles in this state to licensed dealers, dismantlers, or manufacturers, and only at their places of business.

